Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.070

Processing of applications—Contents of applications.

The director may receive and approve applications on a monthly basis but shall receive and approve applications on at least a quarterly basis for each fiscal year. The director shall make every effort to simplify the loan process for applicants. Department staff shall process and assist in the preparation of applications. Each application shall show in detail the nature of the project, the types and numbers of jobs to be created, wages to be paid to new employees, and methods to hire unemployed persons from the area. Each application shall contain a credit analysis of the business to receive the loan. The director may respond on short notice to applications of a serious or immediate nature.

[ 2005 c 136 s 7; 1993 c 512 s 14; 1987 c 461 s 5; 1985 c 164 s 7.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.